Utah statutes.
31A-22-631.   Policy summary or illustration.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), at the time a life insurance
policy is delivered, a policy summary or illustration shall be delivered for
the life insurance policy if:
(i)  the life insurance policy includes riders or supplemental benefits,
including accelerated benefits; and
(ii)  receipt of benefits under the life insurance policy is contingent upon
morbidity requirements.
(b)  In the case of a direct response solicitation, the insurer shall deliver
the policy summary or illustration at the sooner of:
(i)  the applicant's request; or
(ii)  at the time of policy delivery regardless of whether the applicant
requests a policy summary or illustration.
(2)  In addition to complying with all applicable requirements, the policy
summary or illustration shall include:
(a)  a clear and prominent disclosure of how the rider or supplemental benefit
interacts with other components of the policy, including deductions from death
benefits and policy values;
(b)  an illustration for each covered person of:
(i)  the amount of benefits;
(ii)  the length of benefits; and
(iii)  the guaranteed lifetime benefits, if any;
(c)  a disclosure of the maximum premiums for the rider or supplemental
benefit;
(d)  any exclusions, reductions, or limitations on the benefits of the rider
or supplemental benefit; and
(e)  if applicable to the policy type:
(i)  a disclosure of the effects of exercising other rights under the policy;
and
(ii)  guaranteed maximum lifetime benefits.
